Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.190

Application of RCW 9.95.010 through 9.95.170 to inmates previously committed.

The provisions of RCW 9.95.010 through 9.95.170, inclusive, shall apply to all convicted persons serving time in a state correctional facility for crimes committed before July 1, 1984, to the end that at all times the same provisions relating to sentences, imprisonments, and paroles of prisoners shall apply to all inmates thereof.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 342; 1992 c 7 s 28; 1983 c 3 s 10; 1955 c 133 s 18. Prior: (i) 1939 c 142 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 4, part; RRS s 10249-4, part. (ii) 1947 c 92 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-2a, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.